Maryland, session 2026, HB0349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–511.
(c) (1) (i) This paragraph applies to:
1. the Department of State Police;
2. the Anne Arundel County Police Department;
3. the Howard County Police Department; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0349*

HOUSE BILL 349
4. the Harford County Sheriff’s Office.
(ii) [On or before July 1, 2023, a] A law enforcement agency to which
this paragraph applies shall require the use of body–worn cameras, subject to the policy on
the use of body–worn cameras developed by the law enforcement agency, by each SWORN
law enforcement officer, REGARDLESS OF RANK, employed by the law enforcement agency
[who regularly interacts with members of the public as part of the law enforcement officer’s
official duties] WHILE THE OFFICER IS IN UNIFORM, IN PUBLIC, AND CONDUCTING
LAW ENFORCEMENT RELATED DUTIES.
(2) On or before July 1, 2025, a law enforcement agency of a county, other
than a law enforcement agency described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, shall require
the use of body–worn cameras, subject to the policy on the use of body–worn cameras
developed by the law enforcement agency, by each SWORN law enforcement officer,
REGARDLESS OF RANK, employed by the law enforcement agency [who regularly interacts
with members of the public as part of the law enforcement officer’s official duties] WHILE
THE OFFICER IS IN UNIFORM, IN PUBLIC, AND CONDUCTING LAW ENFORCEMENT
RELATED DUTIES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.